Georgia, session 2025_26, HB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 4 of Article 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Stone Mountain Memorial Association, is amended by revising Code Section
12-3-192.1, relating to the purpose of the association, as follows:
"12-3-192.1.
The purposes of the Stone Mountain Memorial Association shall include:
(1) To preserve the natural areas situated within the Stone Mountain Park area;
(2) To provide access to Stone Mountain for Georgia's citizens; and
(3) To maintain an appropriate and suitable memorial for the Confederacy To educate
the public about the natural history of the mountain and its environment, and the history
of human interaction with the mountain and its surroundings."
H. B. 243
- 1 -

LC 33 9739
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 243
- 2 -